Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.032

Qualifications—Teachers of visually impaired—Rules.

Teachers of visually impaired students shall be qualified according to rules adopted by the professional educator standards board.

[ 2005 c 497 s 220; 1996 c 135 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Findings—1996 c 135: See note following RCW 28A.155.105.